Hawaii statutes.
[§321-423]
Confidentiality of data. (a) The identity of, or any information which
alone or in combination with other reasonably available information that may be
used to identify, any person whose information is collected under this
part shall be confidential.

(b) Statistical data and information that do
not identify any person may be released. [L 2002, c 252, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next